Utah statutes.
59-5-110.   Decisions of commission.
Every decision of the commission shall be in writing and notice of the
decision shall be mailed to the taxpayer within 10 days. All decisions become
final upon the expiration of 30 days after notice has been mailed to the
taxpayer, unless proceedings are taken within such time for a review in
accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, in which
case it becomes final as specified in the Administrative Procedures Act.
